Utah statutes.
20A-7-103.   Constitutional amendments and other questions submitted by the
Legislature -- Publication -- Ballot title -- Procedures for submission to
popular vote.
(1)  The procedures contained in this section govern when the Legislature
submits a proposed constitutional amendment or other question to the voters.
(2)  In addition to the publication in the voter information pamphlet required
by Section 20A-7-702, the lieutenant governor shall, not more than 60 days or
less than 14 days before the date of the election, publish the full text of
the amendment, question, or statute in at least one newspaper in every county
of the state where a newspaper is published.
(3)  The legislative general counsel shall:
(a)  entitle each proposed constitutional amendment "Constitutional Amendment
__" and assign it a letter according to the requirements of Section 20A-6-107;
(b)  entitle each proposed question " Proposition Number __" with the number
assigned to the proposition under Section 20A-6-107 placed in the blank;
(c)  draft and designate a ballot title for each proposed amendment or
question submitted by the Legislature that summarizes the subject matter of
the amendment or question; and
(d)  deliver each number and title to the lieutenant governor.
(4)  The lieutenant governor shall certify the number and ballot title of each
amendment or question to the county clerk of each county no later than 50 days
before the date of the election.
(5)  The county clerk of each county shall:
(a)  ensure that both the number and title of each amendment and question is
printed on the sample ballots and official ballots; and
(b)  publish them as provided by law.
